District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.71

Merger or consolidation — Domestic and foreign corporations; filing.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 209, ch. 269, § 71
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 137, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(6)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.71.
1981 Ed., § 29-371.
1973 Ed., § 29-927g.